Washington statutes.
RCW 1.40.060

Appearance of medal—Inscription.

The decoration of the state medal of merit shall be of bronze and shall consist of the seal of the state of Washington, surrounded by a raised laurel wreath and suspended from a ring attached by a dark green ribbon. The reverse of the decoration within the raised laurel wreath shall be inscribed with the words: "For exceptionally meritorious conduct in performing outstanding services to the people and state of Washington."

[ 1986 c 92 s 6.]